North Dakota, session 69, SB2366.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 47-32-02 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
47-32-02. Appearance - Notice of intention to evict - When required - Contents of
notice - When and how served.
1. In anyan action for eviction the time specified in the summons for the appearance of
the defendant may not be fewer than three nor more than fifteen days from the date
on which the summons is issued. If the person cannot be found in the county, of which
the return of the sheriff or process server is prima facie proof, and service has been
attempted at least once between the hours of six p.m. and ten p.m. upon the filing of
an affidavit of the plaintiff or the plaintiff's attorney stating that the defendant cannot be
found or on belief that the defendant is not in this state and a copy of the summons
has been mailed to the defendant at the defendant's last-known address if any is
known to the plaintiff, service of the summons may be made upon the defendant by
the sheriff or process server posting the summons upon the door of the residential
unit.
2. In all cases arising under subsections 4, 5, 6, and 8 of section 47-32-01, three days'
written notice of intention to evict must be given to the lessee, subtenant, or party in
possession, before proceedings can be instituted. The notice must include information
regarding the availability of legal services the lessee, subtenant, or party in possession
may use, including contact information for a nonprofit organization in the state which
provides legal services and assistance to low - income and elderly residents .
Page No. 1 25.0575.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
3. The notice may be served and returned as a summons is served and returned or, if the
party cannot be found, then by the sheriff of the county or a process server posting the
notice conspicuously upon the premises. Service by delivery of a copy of the
summons to the defendant in person within the county must be made at least three
days before the time fixed for the appearance of the defendant. Service elsewhere or
personal service in any other mode must be made at least seven days before the time
fixed for the appearance of the defendant.
Page No. 2 25.0575.01000